Alabama, session 2026rs, HB650.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
28 Section 1. (a) There is created the Permanent Joint
Page 1

Section 1. (a) There is created the Permanent Joint
HB650 INTRODUCED
29 Legislative Advisory Commission on Alabama Boys and Men.
30 (b) The commission shall consist of 14 members,
31 including 10 nonlegislative members and four legislative
32 members, appointed as follows:
33 (1) Eight members appointed by the Governor who meet
34 the following requirements:
35 a. Are nominated by a statewide professional
36 association, nonprofit organization, community-based
37 organization, faith-based organization, or public agency.
38 Nominating entities may submit multiple nominees. The Governor
39 may appoint a member who has not been nominated if there are
40 not at least eight nominees submitted within 30 days of June
41 1, 2026. The Governor shall seek a balance of academic,
42 practitioner, and community-based perspectives, with no more
43 than three members from the same general sector to the extent
44 practicable.
45 b. Possess expertise or experience in education, public
46 health, mental health, workforce development, child and family
47 services, fatherhood engagement programs, or related fields.
48 c. At least one member shall have direct professional,
49 volunteer, or lived experience providing mentorship,
50 fatherhood engagement, or life skills development to boys or
51 young men in a community-based setting.
52 (2) One member of the House of Representatives
53 appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and
54 one member of the House of Representatives appointed by the
55 Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.
56 (3) One member of the Senate appointed by the President
Page 2

(3) One member of the Senate appointed by the President
HB650 INTRODUCED
57 Pro Tempore of the Senate, and one member of the Senate
58 appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate.
59 (4) Two members representing nonprofit or
60 community-based organizations serving boys, men, and families
61 appointed jointly by the Speaker of the House of
62 Representatives and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.
63 The members shall have experience delivering direct services
64 or programs, such as mentorship, fatherhood engagement, youth
65 development, or reentry services, to boys, men, and families.
66 The members shall provide a stakeholder perspective distinct
67 from subdivision (1).
68 (c) The appointing authorities shall coordinate their
69 appointments to assure the advisory commission membership is
70 inclusive and reflects the racial, gender, geographic, urban,
71 rural, and economic diversity of the state. The appointing
72 authorities shall also coordinate their appointments to assure
73 the meaningful inclusion of: (i) female members to provide
74 perspective on family stability, child development, and issues
75 affecting boys in relation to women and families; (ii)
76 multiple generations, including at least one member under 30
77 years of age and one member over 60 years of age; and (iii)
78 individuals with subject-matter expertise, direct service
79 experience, and relevant lived experience.
80 (d)(1) Nonlegislative members of the commission shall
81 serve terms of four years and may be reappointed for a second
82 term.
83 (2) Legislative members shall serve only as long as
84 they hold their public office.
Page 3

they hold their public office.
HB650 INTRODUCED
85 (3) Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the
86 original appointment. A member appointed to fill a vacancy on
87 the commission which occurs before the expiration of the term
88 for which his or her predecessor was appointed shall serve
89 only for the remainder of the term.
90 (e)(1) The legislative members of the commission shall
91 be entitled to their legislative compensation, per diem, and
92 travel expenses for each day they attend a meeting of the
93 commission pursuant to Section 49 of the Constitution of
94 Alabama 2022.
95 (2) The nonlegislative members of the commission shall
96 serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for necessary
97 expenses in attending meetings of the commission pursuant to
98 the policies of their respective appointing authority.
99 (f) The first meeting of the commission shall be held
100 at the call of the Speaker of the House of Representatives no
101 later than August 1, 2027, at which time the members of the
102 commission shall elect a chair and vice chair.
103 (g) The commission shall meet at least once each
104 quarter and may meet, act, and conduct its business at any
105 place within this state during the sessions of the Legislature
106 or any recess thereof, and in the interim period between
107 sessions.
108 (h) The commission shall have the following duties:
109 (1) Study issues affecting boys and men in Alabama,
110 within the following priority areas and as defined in the
111 annual work plan required in subdivision (6):
112 a. Education and workforce development, including
Page 4

a. Education and workforce development, including
HB650 INTRODUCED
113 educational attainment, early literacy, academic outcomes,
114 career readiness, vocational and technical training, and
115 workforce participation.
116 b. Health and well-being, including physical and mental
117 health outcomes, access to care, substance abuse prevention,
118 suicide prevention, and the impact of technology and social
119 media on mental health and development.
120 c. Family stability and fatherhood engagement,
121 including paternal involvement, family formation, marriage
122 stability; barriers to paternal involvement and engagement,
123 such as structural, administrative, and socioeconomic factors;
124 and outcomes associated with family stability.
125 d. Public safety and social development, including
126 social and behavioral development, conflict resolution and
127 de-escalation, life skills necessary for successful transition
128 into adulthood, and preventative diversions from criminal
129 justice system involvement.
130 (2) Identify evidence-based strategies and best
131 practices from other states and jurisdictions to improve
132 outcomes for boys, men, and families.
133 (3) Conduct research, data analysis, public hearings,
134 stakeholder consultations, and educational symposiums or
135 forums as necessary to fulfill its duties.
136 (4) Consult with relevant state agencies, departments,
137 and other public entities to obtain data, information, and
138 technical assistance as necessary to fulfill its duties.
139 (5) Develop evidence-based, data-driven legislative and
140 policy recommendations through a transparent and inclusive
Page 5

policy recommendations through a transparent and inclusive
HB650 INTRODUCED
141 stakeholder process and submit those recommendations to: (i)
142 the Legislature and the Governor, including recommendations
143 for regulatory changes; and (ii) the State Department of
144 Education upon request of the State Superintendent of
145 Education.
146 (6)a. Adopt an annual work plan no later than 60 days
147 prior to the beginning of each regular legislative session.
148 The work plan shall identify not more than five priority issue
149 areas for study during the year and shall include the
150 following:
151 1. Clearly defined research questions for each priority
152 issue area.
153 2. Identification of relevant data sources and metrics
154 to be used in the analysis.
155 3. A description of planned stakeholder engagement,
156 including public hearings, consultations, and other forms of
157 input.
158 4. A general timeline for completion of analysis and
159 development of recommendations.
160 b. For each priority issue area identified in the
161 annual work plan, the commission shall:
162 1. Analyze available data to establish baseline
163 conditions and trends over time;
164 2. Identify contributing factors supported by credible
165 research or data;
166 3. Review evidence-based practices and policies from
167 other states and jurisdictions; and
168 4. Develop specific, actionable legislative or policy
Page 6

4. Develop specific, actionable legislative or policy
HB650 INTRODUCED
169 recommendations.
170 (i) In carrying out its duties, the commission may
171 organize its work into subject-matter subcommittees aligned
172 with its priority issue areas, including education and
173 workforce development, health and well-being, family stability
174 and fatherhood engagement, and public safety and social
175 development.
176 (j) The commission shall submit a report of its
177 findings and recommendations to the Legislature and the
178 Governor no later than the seventh legislative day of each
179 regular session. The report shall, at a minimum, include all
180 of the following:
181 (1) A summary of the commission's annual work plan and
182 priority issue areas detailing:
183 a. Data findings, including data sources and key
184 metrics;
185 b. Analysis of trend and contributing factors;
186 c. A summary of stakeholder input; and
187 d. Specific, evidence-based policy or legislative
188 recommendations.
189 (2) Any limitations in available data or areas
190 requiring further study.
191 (k) This section shall be repealed on October 1, 2030.
192 Section 2. This act shall become effective June 1,
193 2026.
Page 7